dev/latin/apertium-mal.mal.lexc
LEXICON N1 

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ṁ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ṁ"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:%>ttil‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "ttil"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:%>tte CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "tte"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>ttinṟe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "ttinṟe"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>ttin CLIT-N ; ! "ttin"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>ttinu CLIT-N ; ! "ttinu" ! "debug"
%<n%>%<sg%>:%>tta N-CASES-SG ; ! ""

%<n%>%<sg%>%<cmp%>: # ; ! "for debugging"
!plural
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>ṅṅaḷ‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ṅṅaḷ‍"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:%>ṅṅaḷe CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ṅṅale"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>ṅṅaḷuṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "ṅṅaḷuṭe"
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>ṅṅa N-CASES-PL ; ! "ṅṅaḷ‍"

%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:%» NominalStems ; ! Use/Circ

LEXICON N2-COMMON

%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<sg%>%<loc%>:yil‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "yil‍"
%<sg%>%<acc%>:ye CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ye"
%<sg%>%<gen%>:yuṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "yuṭe"
%<sg%>%<dat%>:ykk CLIT-N ; ! "yk"
%<sg%>%<dat%>:kk CLIT-N ; ! "k"  ! debug
%<sg%>%<dat%>:ykku CLIT-N ; ! "yk" ! "debug"
%<sg%>%<dat%>:kku CLIT-N ; ! "k"  ! debug
%<sg%>:ya N-CASES-SG ; ! ""
!plural
%<pl%>%<nom%>:kaḷ‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "kaḷ‍"
%<pl%>%<acc%>:kaḷe CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "kaḷe"
%<pl%>%<gen%>:kaḷuṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "kaḷuṭe"
%<pl%>:ka N-CASES-PL ; ! "kaḷ‍"

LEXICON N2

%<n%>: N2-COMMON ;

%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:%» NominalStems ; ! Use/Circ
%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:%» Verbs ; ! DEBug

LEXICON N3-COMMON

%<sg%>%<nom%>:%> CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ṁ"
%<sg%>%<nom%>:%>‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ṁ"
%<sg%>%<loc%>:%>̔il‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "il‍"
%<sg%>%<acc%>:%>̔ine CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ine"
%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>̔inṟe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "̔inṟe"
%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>̔in CLIT-N ; ! "in"
%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>̔inu CLIT-N ; ! "inu" ! "debug"
%<sg%>:%>̔ina N-CASES-SG ; ! ""

LEXICON N3

%<n%>: N3-COMMON ; 

!plural
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:̔ukaḷ‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ukaḷ‍"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:̔ukaḷe CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ukaḷe"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:̔ukaḷuṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "ukaḷuṭe"
%<n%>%<pl%>:̔uka N-CASES-PL ; ! "ukaḷ‍"

%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:%» NominalStems ; ! Use/Circ

LEXICON N4

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<n%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:yil‍ CLIT-N-LOC; ! "yil‍"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:yuṭe CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "yuṭe"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ye CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "ye"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ykk CLIT-N ; ! "yk"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ykku CLIT-N ; ! "yku" ! "debug"
%<n%>%<sg%>:ya N-CASES-SG ; ! ""
!plural
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:mār‍  CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "mār‍"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:māril‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "māril‍"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:māre CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "māre"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:māruṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "māre"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:mār‍kk CLIT-N ; ! "mār‍k"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:mār‍kku CLIT-N ; ! "mār‍k" ! "debug"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:mārēāṭ CLIT-N ; ! "mārēāṭ"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:mārāl‍ CLIT-N ; ! "mārāl‍"

%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:%» NominalStems ; ! Use/Circ

LEXICON N5

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ṁ"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ṭil‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "il‍"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:̔ine CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ine"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:̔inṟe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "̔inṟe"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:̔in CLIT-N ; ! "in"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:̔inu CLIT-N ; ! "inu"
%<n%>%<sg%>:̔ina N-CASES-SG ; ! ""

!plural
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:̔ukaḷ‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ukaḷ‍"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:̔ukaḷe CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ukaḷe"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:̔ukaḷuṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "ukaḷuṭe"
%<n%>%<pl%>:̔uka N-CASES-PL ; ! "ukaḷ‍"

%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:%» NominalStems ; ! Use/Circ
!noun6 :pēr‍
LEXICON N6

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ṁ"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:̔u CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ṁ" ! "debug"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:̔il‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "il‍"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:̔ine CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ine"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:̔inṟe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "̔inṟe"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:‍kk CLIT-N ; ! "in"
%<n%>%<sg%>:̔ina N-CASES-SG ; ! ""

%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:%» NominalStems ; ! Use/Circ

LEXICON N7 ! viṣu
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<n%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:vil‍ CLIT-N-LOC; ! "yil‍"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:vinṟe CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "yuṭe"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:vine CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "ye"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:vin CLIT-N ; ! "yk"
%<n%>%<sg%>:ra N-CASES-SG ; ! ""
!plural
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:kkaḷ‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "mār‍"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:kkaḷil‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "māril‍"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:kkaḷe CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "māre"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:kkaḷuṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "māre"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:kkaḷ‍k CLIT-N ; ! "mār‍k"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:kkaḷēāṭ CLIT-N ; ! "mārēāṭ"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:kkaḷāl‍ CLIT-N ; ! "mārāl‍"
%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:%» NominalStems ; ! Use/Circ

LEXICON N8 ! adyāpakan‍
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:n‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! ""
%<n%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:nil‍ CLIT-N-LOC; ! "yil‍"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:nṟe CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "yuṭe"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ne CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "ye"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:n CLIT-N ; ! "yk"
%<n%>%<sg%>:va N-CASES-SG ; ! ""
!plural
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:r‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "mār‍"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ril‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "māril‍"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:re CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "māre"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ruṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "māre"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:r‍kk CLIT-N ; ! "mār‍k"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<soc%>:rēāṭ CLIT-N ; ! "mārēāṭ"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:rāl‍ CLIT-N ; ! "mārāl‍"
%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:%» NominalStems ; ! Use/Circ

LEXICON N9-COMMON

%<sg%>%<nom%>:%>r‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ṁ"
%<sg%>%<loc%>:%>ṟil‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "il‍"
%<sg%>%<acc%>:%>ṟine CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ine"
%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>ṟinṟe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "̔inṟe"
%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>ṟin CLIT-N ; ! "in"
%<sg%>:%>ṟina N-CASES-SG ; ! ""

LEXICON N9

%<n%>: N9-COMMON ; 

!plural
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ṟukaḷ‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ukaḷ‍"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ṟukaḷe CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ukaḷe"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ṟukaḷuṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "ukaḷuṭe"
%<n%>%<pl%>:ṟuka N-CASES-PL ; ! "ukaḷ‍"

%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:%» NominalStems ; ! Use/Circ

LEXICON N10 ! "kālatt" 

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ṁ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ṁ"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:%>tt CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "tt"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:%>ttu CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "ttu" ! "debug"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:%>tte CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "tte"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>ttinṟe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "ttinṟe"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>ttin CLIT-N ; ! "ttin"
%<n%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>ttinu CLIT-N ; ! "ttinu" ! "debug"
%<n%>%<sg%>:%>tta N-CASES-SG ; ! ""

%<n%>%<sg%>%<cmp%>: # ; ! "for debugging"
!plural
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>ṅṅaḷ‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ṅṅaḷ‍"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:%>ṅṅaḷe CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ṅṅale"
%<n%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>ṅṅaḷuṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "ṅṅaḷuṭe"
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>ṅṅa N-CASES-PL ; ! "ṅṅaḷ‍"

%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:%» NominalStems ; ! Use/Circ

LEXICON NP1

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ṁ"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:̔il‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "il‍"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:̔inṟe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "̔inṟe"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:̔ine CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ine"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:̔in CLIT-N ; ! "in"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>:̔ina N-CASES-SG ; ! ""

!plural
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:̔ukaḷ‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ukaḷ‍"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:̔ukaḷe CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ukaḷe"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:̔ukaḷuṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "ukaḷuṭe"
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>:̔uka N-CASES-PL ; ! "ukaḷ‍"
LEXICON NP1-COG

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ṁ"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:̔il‍ CLIT-N-LOC ; ! "il‍"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:̔inṟe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "̔inṟe"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:̔ine CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ine"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:̔in CLIT-N ; ! "in"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>:̔ina N-CASES-SG ; ! ""

!plural
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:̔ukaḷ‍ CLIT-N-NOM ; ! "ukaḷ‍"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:̔ukaḷe CLIT-N-ACC ; ! "ukaḷe"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:̔ukaḷuṭe CLIT-N-GEN ; ! "ukaḷuṭe"
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:̔uka N-CASES-PL ; ! "ukaḷ‍"

LEXICON NominalStems
vīṭ:vīṭa N5 ; ! "vīṭ" ! "house"
sahēādari:sahēādari N4 ; ! "sahēādari" !"sister"
am'ma:am'ma N4 ; ! "am'ma" ! "mother"
pēr‍:pēra N6 ; ! "per" ! "" ! "" 
kampyūṭṭar‍:kampyūṭṭa N9;
caturaśrakilēāmīṟṟar‍:caturaśrakilēāmīṟṟa N9;
senṟīmīṟṟar‍:senṟīmīṟṟa N9 ;
senṟar‍:senṟa N9 ;
okṭēābar‍:okṭēāba N9 ; ! "" ! "october"
pavar‍:pava N9; ! ""
septambar‍:septamba N9; ! ""
kaḷikkār‍:kaḷikkā N9; ! ""
senṟimīṟṟar‍:senṟimīṟṟa N9; ! ""
mēāṭṭēār‍:mēāṭṭēā N9; ! ""
preāphasar‍:preāphasa N9; ! ""
periyār‍:periyā N9; ! ""
mey:meya N3 ; ! " " ! "may"
sthānaṁ:sthāna N10 ; ! "sthānaṁ" ! "stripe, status, state, stall, stage, situation, site, seat, scope, room, region, rank, quarter, post, position, point, placing, place, origin, opening, location, grade, goal, establishment, disposition"
samayaṁ:samaya N10 ; ! "samayaṁ" ! "time, tide, term, season, period, opportunity, occasion, hour, duration, day, date, appointment"
sisṟṟaṁ:sisṟṟa  N1;
kālaṁ:kāla N10 ; ! "kālaṁ" ! "time, tide, season, period, era, day"
inaṁ:ina N1 ; ! "inaṁ" ! "type, strain, sort, sex, quality, persuasion, kind, item, genre, gender, form, family, denomination, category, breed"
vyavasāyaṁ:vyavasāya N1 ; ! "vyavasāyaṁ" ! "undertaking, trade, pursuit, profession, practice, labour, investment, industry, endeavour, business"
jīvitakālaṁ:jīvitakāla N10 ; ! "jīvitakālaṁ" ! "time, life"
śalabhaṁ:śalabha N1 ; ! "śalabhaṁ" ! "moth"
kuṟēkkālaṁ:kuṟēkkāla N10 ; ! "kuṟēkkālaṁ" ! "season"
bharaṇakālaṁ:bharaṇakāla N10 ; ! "bharaṇakālaṁ" ! "reign"
purātanakālaṁ:purātanakāla N10 ; ! "purātanakālaṁ" ! "antiquity"
kuṭṭikkālaṁ:kuṭṭikkāla N10 ; ! "kuṭṭikkālaṁ" ! "childhood"
nāṇayaṁ:nāṇaya N1 ; ! "nāṇayaṁ" ! "piece, money, dud, currency, coin, cash"
santēāṣaṁ:santēāṣa N1 ; ! "santēāṣaṁ" ! "smile"
avasānakālaṁ:avasānakāla N10 ; ! "avasānakālaṁ" ! "twilight"
maḻakkālaṁ:maḻakkāla N10 ; ! "maḻakkālaṁ" ! "rain"
jāmyaṁ:jāmya N1 ; ! "jāmyaṁ" ! "warranty, security, pledge, pawn, mortgage, guarantee, bail"
caritrātītakālaṁ:caritrātītakāla N10 ; ! "caritrātītakālaṁ" ! "prehistory"
pakṣāghātaṁ:pakṣāghāta N1 ; ! "pakṣāghātaṁ" ! "paralysis"
ahaṅkāraṁ:ahaṅkāra N1 ; ! "ahaṅkāraṁ" ! "self-esteem, pride, conceit, cheek, arrogance, affectation"
bhūvijñānīyaṁ:bhūvijñānīya N1 ; ! "bhūvijñānīyaṁ" ! "geology"
dantaṁ:danta N1 ; ! "dantaṁ" ! "tooth, ivory, fang"
avadhikkālaṁ:avadhikkāla N10 ; ! "avadhikkālaṁ" ! "vacation"
tilakaṁ:tilaka N1 ; ! "tilakaṁ" ! "glory"
tātparyaṁ:tātparya N1;
dvīp:dvīpa N3 ; ! "dvīp" ! "island"
tekk:tekka N3; ! ""
grūpp:grūppa N3; ! ""
sikh:sikha N3; ! ""
marunn:marunna N3 ; ! "marunn" ! "drug"
ōṭ:ōṭa N5 ; ! "ōṭ" ! "bismuth"
veb:veba N3 ; ! "" ! "web"
paṭṭ:paṭṭa N3 ; ! "paṭṭ" ! "silk"
caṭṭakkūṭ:caṭṭakkūṭa N5 ; ! "caṭṭakkūṭ" ! "grid, chassis"
grāphaiṟṟ:grāphaiṟṟa N3 ; ! "grāphaiṟṟ" ! "graphite"
paṇimuṭakk:paṇimuṭakka N3 ; ! "paṇimuṭakk" ! "strike"
pār‍lamenṟ:pār‍lamenṟa  N3;
kēāḷaj:kēāḷaja  N3;
cuḷḷikkāṭ:cuḷḷikkāṭa N5 ; ! "cuḷḷikkāṭ" ! "heath"
kaḷi:kaḷi N2 ; ! "kaḷi" ! "sport, spectacle, recreation, play, game, fun"
peṇ‍kuṭṭi:peṇ‍kuṭṭi N2 ; ! "peṇ‍kuṭṭi" ! "maid, girl, bird"
khyāti:khyāti N2 ; ! "khyāti" ! "stock, reputation, renown, name, glory, fame, credit"
paṭṭiṇi:paṭṭiṇi N2 ; ! "paṭṭiṇi" ! "wolf, starvation"
kāṭṭupanni:kāṭṭupanni N2 ; ! "kāṭṭupanni" ! "swine"
kīri:kīri N2 ; ! "kīri" ! "weasel"
atr̥pti:atr̥pti N2 ; ! "atr̥pti" ! "greed"
mēni:mēni N2 ; ! "mēni" ! "body"
prabhu:prabhu N7 ; ! "prabhu" ! "prince, lord, knight, count, aristocrat"
hindu:hindu N7; ! ""
ubuṇṭu:ubuṇṭu N7; ! ""
madhu:madhu N7 ; ! "madhu" ! "honey, drink"
dhātu:dhātu N7 ; ! "dhātu" ! "stem, sodium, root, ore, mineral, metal"
śatru:śatru N7 ; ! "śatru" ! "rival, opponent, foe, enemy, antagonist"
śiśu:śiśu N7 ; ! "śiśu" ! "infant, child, brat, baby"
tempu:tempu N7 ; ! "" ! "thebu"
karu:karu N7 ; ! "karu" ! "tool, mould, die"
puḻu:puḻu N7 ; ! "puḻu" ! "worm, weevil, insect"
paramāṇu:paramāṇu N7 ; ! "paramāṇu" ! "atom"
antarīkṣavāyu:antarīkṣavāyu N7 ; ! "antarīkṣavāyu" ! "atmosphere"
mantrisabha:mantrisabha N2 ; ! "mantrisabha" ! "ministry, cabinet"
daśa:daśa N2 ; ! "daśa" ! "state, stage, phase"
kaḻuta:kaḻuta N2 ; ! "kaḻuta" ! "donkey, ass"
sahēāpakārita:sahēāpakārita N2 ; ! "sahēāpakārita" ! "mutualism"
makan‍:makana N3;
ad'dhyāpakan‍:ad'dhyāpaka N8; ! "" ! ""
purēāhitan‍:purēāhita N8; ! "" ! ""
sthāpakan‍:sthāpaka N8; ! "" ! ""
manuṣyan‍:manuṣya N8; ! "" ! ""
LEXICON ProperNouns 
jeyins:jeyinsa NP1 ; ! "jeyins" ! "James"
tēāmas:tēāmasa NP1 ; ! "" ! "thomas"
jēāsaph:jēāsapha NP1 ; ! "" ! "josaph"
rājīv:rājīva NP1 ; ! "" ! "rajeev"
muham'mad:muham'mada NP1 ; ! "" ! "muhammed"
ṟēābar‍ṭṭ:ṟēābar‍ṭṭa NP1; ! ""
jēār‍jj:jēār‍jja NP1; ! ""
jēār‍j:jēār‍ja NP1; ! ""
ḍēviḍ:ḍēviḍa NP1; ! ""
palēās:palēāsa NP1; ! ""
phraḍaṟik:phraḍaṟika NP1;
ḍiklar‍kk:ḍiklar‍kka NP1-COG;
lūyis:lūyisa NP1;
